Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.240

Existing rights not affected.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person presently committed from exercising a right presently available to him or her for obtaining release from confinement, including the right to petition for a writ of habeas corpus.

[ 1999 c 13 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 24.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—1999 c 13: See note following RCW 10.77.010.